tests/vowelreduction.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../uig.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../uig.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[twol] ا raises to ې":
    باش<n><px3sp><nom> : بېشى
    باش<n><loc> : باشتا

 "[twol] ا reduces to ى":
    باقچا<n><px3sp><nom> : باقچىسى
    باقچا<n><loc> : باقچىدا
    بالا<n><px3sp><nom> : بالىسى
    بالا<n><loc> : بالىدا
    بالا<n><pl><nom> : بالىلار

 "[twol] ا doesn't reduce in closed syllables":
    باقچا<n><px1sg><loc> : باقچامدا

 "[twol] ا doesn't reduce in (borrowed) stems":
    ئالىم<np><ant><m><nom> : ئالىم
    ئالىم<np><ant><m><abl> : ئالىمدىن
    دائىم<adv> : دائىم
    باھايىتى<adv> : باھايىتى

 "[twol] {A} reduces in open syllables":
    باقچا<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : باقچىلىرى
    ئالد<n><px3sp><loc><attr> : ئالدىندىكى

 "[twol] {A} doesn't reduce in closed syllables":
    باقچا<n><pl><acc> : باقچىلارنى
